New York, session 2025-2026, A1221.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general business law is amended by adding a new section 2 391-x to read as follows: 3 § 391-x. Method for contract cancellation. Unless otherwise author- 4 ized by law, rule, or regulation, any business that contracts with a 5 consumer shall allow such consumer to cancel such contract using the 6 same method that the business and consumer used to enter such contract, 7 including but not limited to, in writing or online. For the purposes of 8 this section, "consumer" shall mean a natural person residing in this 9 state that enters into a contract for personal, family or household 10 purposes. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01735-01-5